pl: Opcje dźwięku: Dzwon; Klikn; Bęben; Liczba głosów; Inne
da: Lydindstillinger: Klokke; Klik; Tromme; Stemmeantal; Andet
lt-LT: Garso parinktys: Varpelis; Spragtukas; Būgnas; Taktų skaičiavimas; Kita
ko: 사운드 옵션: 벨; 클릭; 드럼; 음성 수; 기타
ru: Параметры звука: Колокол; Щелчок; Барабан; Количество голосов; Другое
sv: Ljudalternativ: Klocka; Klick; Trumma; Antal röster; Övrigt
hr-HR: Mogućnosti zvuka: Zvono; Klik; Bubanj; Brojanje glasova; Ostalo
hu: Hangbeállítások: Harang; Kattintás; Dob; Hangszám; Egyéb
de: Soundoptionen: Glocke; Klicken; Trommel; Stimmenzählen; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Звукови опции: Звънец; Щракане; Барабан; Брой гласове; Други
en: Sound options: Bell; Click; Drum; Voice count; Other
el: Επιλογές ήχου: Κωδωνοειδές; Κλικ; Τάμπουρο; Καταμέτρηση φωνής; Άλλο
fi: Ääniasetukset: Kello; Klikkaus; Rumpu; Äänen määrä; Muu
it: Opzioni audio: Campana; Click; Tamburo; Voci; Altro
es: Opciones de sonido: Campana; Clic; Tambor; Recuento de voces; Otros
nb: Lydalternativer: Bjelle; Klikk; Tromme; Antall stemmer; Annet
vi: Tuỳ chọn âm thanh: Chuông; Nhấp; Trống; Đếm giọng nói; Khác
ro-RO: Opțiuni de sunet: Clopot; Clic; Tambur; Numărarea vocală; Altele
tr: Ses Seçenekleri: Zil; Tıklama; Davul; Ses sayımı; Diğer
sk-SK: Možnosti zvuku: Zvon; Kliknite; Bubon; Počet hlasov; Iné
ja: サウンドオプション: ベル; クリック; ドラム; ボイスカウント; その他
zh-TW: 聲音選項: 鐘聲; 點擊聲; 鼓; 語音計數; 其他
sl-SI: Zvočne možnosti: Zvonec; Klik; Bobenska; Število glasov; Drugo
th: ตัวเลือกเสียง: กระดิ่ง; เสียงคลิก; กลอง; ตัวนับจังหวะเสียง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 声音选项: 铃声; 咔哒声; 鼓; 声音数量; 其他
fr: Options sonores: Cloche; Clique; Tambour; Nombre de voix; Autre
cs: Možnosti zvuku: Zvonek; Kliknutí; Buben; Počet hlasů; Jiné
nl: Geluidsopties: Klok; Klik; Drum; Aantal stemmen; Andere
pt-PT: Opções de som: Sino; Clique; Tambor; Contagem de vozes; Outro
pt-BR: Opções de som: Sino; Clique; Tambor; Contagem de vozes; Outro